Hawaii statutes.
§431R-5 Violations; penalties. (a) The
insurance commissioner may assess a fine of up to $10,000 for each violation by
a pharmacy benefit manager or prescription drug benefit plan provider who is in
violation of section 431R-2 or 431R-3. In addition, the insurance commissioner
may order the pharmacy benefit manager to take specific affirmative corrective action
or make restitution.

(b) Failure of a pharmacy benefit manager to comply
with a previously agreed upon contractual retail pharmacy network agreement pursuant
to section 431R-2 or 431R-3 shall be an unfair or deceptive act or practice as provided
in section 431:13-102.

(c) A pharmacy benefit manager or prescription
drug benefit plan provider may appeal any decision made by the insurance commissioner
in accordance with chapter 91.

(d) Every person and its officers, employees,
and representatives subject to investigation or examination by the commissioner
under this chapter shall produce and make freely accessible to the commissioner
the accounts, records, documents, and files in the person's possession or
control relating to the subject of the investigation or examination and shall
otherwise facilitate the investigation or examination.

(e) Every person and its officers, employees,
and representatives subject to investigation or examination by the commissioner
under this chapter shall issue a written response no later than fifteen working
days after receiving a written inquiry from the commissioner regarding a claim
or complaint. The response shall be more than an acknowledgment that the
commissioner's communication has been received and shall adequately address the
concerns stated in the communication. [L 2013, c 226,
pt of §2; am L 2016, c 141, §15]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next